Utah statutes.
78B-6-107.   Compliance with the Interstate Compact on Placement of Children
-- Compliance with the Indian Child Welfare Act.
(1)  In any adoption proceeding the petition for adoption shall state whether
the child was born in another state and, if so, both the petition and the
court's final decree of adoption shall state that the requirements of Title
62A, Chapter 4a, Part 7, Interstate Compact on Placement of Children, have
been complied with.
(2)  In any adoption proceeding involving an "Indian child," as defined in 25
U.S.C. Sec. 1903, a child-placing agency and the petitioners shall comply with
the Indian Child Welfare Act, Title 25, Chapter 21, of the United States Code.
